apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="rec"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="url"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="sym"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="mon"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
   
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ordinals-century">
      <e>
        <re>([2-9][04-9]|1[0-9]|[4-9])</re>
        <i>th</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]1|1)</re>
        <i>st</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]2|2)</re>
        <i>nd</i>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([2-9]3|3)</re>
        <i>rd</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BC">
      <e><i></i></e>
      <e><i><b/>BC</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>CE</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>BCE</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>AD</i></e>
      <!-- As this can be sentence final, allow sentence to be grabbed as usual -->
      <e><i><b/>B.C</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>C.E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>B.C.E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>A.D</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>B.<b/>C</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>C.<b/>E</i></e>
      <e><i><b/>A.<b/>D</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>B.C.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>C.E.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>B.C.E.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>A.D.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>B.<b/>C.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>C.<b/>E.</i></e>
      <e r="RL"><i><b/>A.<b/>D.</i></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aposchar">
      <e>
        <i>'</i>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>’</l>
          <r>'</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="emails">
      <e>
        <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
	<re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z]+)+)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
   <pardef n="ordinals">
    
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]1|1)</re>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]2|2)</re>
        <p>
          <l>nd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>([0-9]*[02-9]3|3)</re>
        <p>
          <l>rd</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>1[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]*([4-90]|1[0-9])</re>
        <p>
          <l>th</l>
         <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>     
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>    
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>    
    </pardef> 

 <pardef n="time">
      <e c="12:00" r="RL">
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?:[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+[.:][0-5][0-9](pm|PM|am|AM)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="currency">
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([. ,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[£$€][0-9]+([. ,][0-9][0-9][0-9])*([.,][0-9]+)?m</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>





    <pardef n="expensive__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that form the comparative and superlative forms with more and the most respectively">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="long/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that add -er and -est to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="humdrum"><i>humdrum</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Franco-German"><p><l>Franco-German</l><r>franco-german</r></p><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="acoustic"><i>acoustic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bright"><i>bright</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="capable"><i>capable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="clear"><i>clear</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dark"><i>dark</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="decisive"><i>decisive</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dumb"><i>dumb</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="exotic"><i>exotic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="just"><i>just</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="full"><i>full</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hard"><i>hard</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hereditary"><i>hereditary</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="intestinal"><i>intestinal</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="kind"><i>kind</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="low"><i>low</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mixed"><i>mixed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="narrow"><i>narrow</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mischievous"><i>mischievous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stray"><i>stray</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bland"><i>bland</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="crisp"><i>crisp</i><par n="long/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="praiseworthy"><i>praiseworthy</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="likeable"><i>likeable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="old-fashioned"><i>old-fashioned</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pink"><i>pink</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="preventive"><i>preventive</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="proud"><i>proud</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="raw"><i>raw</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="semiannual"><i>semiannual</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shallow"><i>shallow</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="gruff"><i>gruff</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="slow"><i>slow</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sober"><i>sober</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="south"><i>south</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tall"><i>tall</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="threatening"><i>threatening</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vulnerable"><i>vulnerable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="warm"><i>warm</i><par n="long/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="acyclic"><i>acyclic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="conceivable"><i>conceivable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="factorial"><i>factorial</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="intestate"><i>intestate</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="khaki"><i>khaki</i><par n="long/__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="onomastic"><i>onomastic</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="recycleable"><i>recycleable</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>     </e>
<e lm="(x)th century (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>century</i><par n="BC"/><i/><par n="east__n"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th and (y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>and<b/></i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i/><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
<e lm="(x)th-(y)th centuries (AD|BC)"><par n="ordinals-century"/><i>-</i><par n="ordinals-century"/><i><b/>centuries</i><par n="BC"/><i/><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
    <e>      <par n="emails"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="urls"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="ordinals"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="time"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="currency"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="acronimos"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="numeros"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="coma"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="cometa"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="paresq"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="pardret"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="separ"/>    </e>
    <e>      <par n="guionet"/>    </e>
